Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-622
Full control of access, defined.

Full control of access shall mean that the right of owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons to access or view is fully controlled by public authority having jurisdiction and that such control is exercised to give preference to through traffic by providing access connections with selected public roads only and by prohibiting crossings or intersections at grade or direct private driveway connections.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 118.